Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1714
Ongoing business, defined.

Ongoing business shall mean one which for at least six months previous to the sale:

(1) Has been operated from a specific given location;

(2) Has been open for business to the general public; and

(3) Has had all equipment and supplies necessary for operating the business located at the specific given location.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 14.